Utah statutes.
48-1-46.   Professional relationship -- Personal liability.

(1)  Sections 48-1-41 through 48-1-48 do not alter any law applicable to the relationship between a person rendering professional services and a person receiving those services, including liability arising out of those professional services.  All persons rendering professional services shall remain personally liable for any results of that person's acts or omissions.

(2)  No partner or employee of a limited liability partnership is personally liable for the acts or omissions of any other partner or employee of the limited liability partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 61, 1994 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

